New York, session 2025-2026, A4285.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 77 of the cannabis law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 15 to read as follows: 3 15. Adult-use cannabis products shall only be sold, offered for sale 4 or given away upon a premises licensed to sell adult-use cannabis for 5 on-site consumption under this chapter between the hours of eleven ante 6 meridiem and eleven post meridiem. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 8 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06599-01-5